Illinois, session 104th, HB5293.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Powers and 5Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 6amended by adding Section 2310-544 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2310/2310-544 new)8    Sec. 2310-544. Grooming Awareness Public Educational and 9Outreach Program. 10    (a) As used in this Section, "grooming" has the meaning 11ascribed to that term in Section 11-25 of the Criminal Code of 122012.13    (b) The Department of Public Health shall conduct a 14Grooming Awareness Public Educational and Outreach Program, 15which is a public education and outreach program concerning 16the grooming of children, including, but not limited to, 17grooming behaviors and how to recognize, prevent, and report 18grooming behaviors. The Department of Public Health may work 19with other organizations to help conduct the Program which may 20include, but is not limited to, the Illinois Coalition Against 21Sexual Assault (ICASA) or the Chicago Alliance Against Sexual 22Exploitation (CAASE).23    (c) The Department of Public Health may adopt rules that   HB5293- 2 -LRB104 18644 RLC 32087 b1are necessary to conduct the Program. 2    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 3Section 11-27 as follows: 4    (720 ILCS 5/11-27 new)5    Sec. 11-27. Failure to report grooming of a child.6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Child" means any person under 17 years of age.8    "Grooming" has the same meaning for that term in Section 911-25 of this Code.10    "Sex offense" means any violation of Article 11 of this 11Code, including grooming.12    "Sexual conduct" means masturbation, sexual conduct, or 13sexual penetration as defined in Section 11-0.1 of this Code.14    (b) A person 18 years of age or older commits failure to 15report grooming of a child when he or she personally observes 16the grooming between a person whom he or she knows is 18 years 17of age or older and a person he or she knows is a child, and 18knowingly fails to report the grooming to law enforcement.19    (c) This Section does not apply to a person who makes 20timely and reasonable efforts to stop the sex offense or 21unlawful sexual conduct by reporting the grooming or sexual 22conduct in conformance with the Abused and Neglected Child 23Reporting Act or by reporting the sex offense or causing a 24report to be made, to medical or law enforcement authorities   HB5293- 3 -LRB104 18644 RLC 32087 b1or anyone who is a mandated reporter under Section 4 of the 2Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act.3    (d) A person may not be charged with the offense of failure 4to report grooming of a child until the person who committed 5the offense is charged with grooming, criminal sexual assault, 6aggravated criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual 7assault of a child, criminal sexual abuse, or aggravated 8criminal sexual abuse.9    (e) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of failure to 10report grooming of a child that the person who personally 11observed the grooming had a reasonable apprehension that 12timely action to stop the sex offense or unlawful sexual 13conduct would result in the imminent infliction of death, 14great bodily harm, permanent disfigurement, or permanent 15disability to that person or another in retaliation for 16reporting.17    (f) Sentence. A person who commits failure to report 18grooming of a child is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for the 19first violation and a Class 4 felony for a second or subsequent 20violation.21    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to allow 22prosecution of a person who personally observes the act of 23grooming and assists with an investigation and any subsequent 24prosecution of the offender.